Wisconsin, session 2025, SB558.
do enact as follows:SB558,11Section 1. 323.32 of the statutes is created to read:SB558,2,32323.32 Disaster assistance for individuals and businesses grant 3programs. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB558,2,64(a) “Business” means a business or financial institution authorized to conduct 5the activities of the business or financial institution in this state pursuant to a 6certificate of authority from the department of financial institutions.SB558,2,77(b) “Household” has the meaning given in s. 287.17 (1) (h).SB558,2,128(2) Creation and administration. (a) The department of military affairs 9shall create a program to award grants to individuals who are adversely affected by 10a disaster-related state of emergency declared by the governor under s. 323.10 on or 11after January 1, 2025, for the purpose of meeting the individuals’ disaster-related 12expenses.SB558,3,41(b) The department of military affairs shall create a program to award grants 2to businesses that are adversely affected by a disaster-related state of emergency 3declared by the governor under s. 323.10 on or after January 1, 2025, for the 4purpose of meeting the businesses’ disaster-related expenses.SB558,3,95(3) Grants to individuals. (a) Grants awarded. 1. Subject to subd. 2., the 6department of military affairs shall award grants to individuals eligible under par. 7(c) who are adversely affected by a disaster-related state of emergency declared by 8the governor under s. 323.10 on or after January 1, 2025, for the purpose of meeting 9the individuals’ disaster-related expenses.SB558,3,11102. The department of military affairs is not obligated to award a grant under 11subd. 1. if it does not have sufficient funds available to award the grant.SB558,3,1612(b) Eligible expenses. Expenses eligible to be met by a grant under this 13subsection shall be limited to the expenses of fixing or replacing personal property 14damaged by the disaster, home repair conducted by a contractor approved by the 15federal department of housing and urban development that is necessary due to 16damage from the disaster, and temporary housing assistance.SB558,3,1817(c) Individual eligibility. Except as provided in par. (d), an individual is 18eligible for a grant under par. (a) if all of the following apply:SB558,3,22191. The individual applies for the grant in a manner as determined by the 20department of military affairs and within 90 days after a disaster-related state of 21emergency declared by the governor under s. 323.10 or within 90 days after the 22effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], whichever is later.SB558,3,24232. The individual provides to the department of military affairs a receipt for 24any disaster-related eligible expenses for which the individual seeks a grant.SB558,4,513. The individual signs and provides to the department of military affairs an 2affidavit committing to return to the department of military affairs any part of the 3grant that is or becomes duplicated by the individual’s receipt of insurance money 4or other source of disaster-related assistance that is not a loan awarded directly by 5the federal government.SB558,4,86(d) Grant limits. 1. The department of military affairs may not award more 7than $25,000 in grants to a single household in relation to a single disaster-related 8state of emergency declared by the governor under s. 323.10.SB558,4,1192. No grants may be awarded under this subsection to individuals who are 10adversely affected by a disaster-related state of emergency declared by the governor 11under s. 323.10 if all of the following apply:SB558,4,1412a. The president of the United States has declared a major disaster to exist in 13this state, and the major disaster is the same disaster that forms the basis of the 14disaster-related state of emergency declared by the governor under s. 323.10.SB558,4,1715b. Federal aid is made available to individuals who are adversely affected by 16the major disaster declared by the president of the United States in a manner 17similar to the grant program under this subsection.SB558,4,2218(4) Grants to Businesses. (a) Grants awarded. 1. Subject to subd. 2, the 19department of military affairs shall award grants to businesses eligible under par. 20(c) that are adversely affected by a disaster-related state of emergency declared by 21the governor under s. 323.10 on or after January 1, 2025, for the purpose of meeting 22the businesses’ disaster-related expenses.SB558,4,24232. The department of military affairs is not obligated to award a grant under 24subd. 1. if it does not have sufficient funds available to award the grant.SB558,5,51(b) Eligible expenses. Expenses eligible to be met by a grant under this 2subsection shall be limited to the expenses of fixing or replacing a business’s 3property damaged by the disaster, repair to the business necessary due to damage 4from the disaster, payroll assistance, working capital, and other normal business 5operating expenses.SB558,5,76(c) Business eligibility. Except as provided in par. (d), a business is eligible for 7a grant under par. (a) if all of the following apply:SB558,5,881. The business operates in this state.SB558,5,1192. The business has been damaged as a result of the business’s operation in a 10portion of the state included in the governor’s disaster-related state of emergency 11declaration made under s. 323.10.SB558,5,15122. The business applies for the grant in a manner as determined by the 13department of military affairs and within 90 days after a disaster-related state of 14emergency declared by the governor under s. 323.10 or within 90 days after the 15effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], whichever is later.SB558,5,19163. The business provides to the department of military affairs a receipt for any 17disaster-related eligible expenses for which the business seeks a grant and for 18which the business has incurred as a result of the disaster underlying the 19governor’s state of emergency declaration made under s. 323.10.SB558,5,24204. A person with a controlling interest in the business signs and provides to 21the department of military affairs an affidavit committing to return to the 22department of military affairs any part of the grant that is or becomes duplicated by 23the business’s receipt of insurance money or other source of disaster-related 24assistance that is not a loan awarded directly by the federal government.SB558,6,31(d) Grant limits. 1. The department of military affairs may not award more 2than $50,000 in grants to a single business in relation to a single disaster-related 3state of emergency declared by the governor under s. 323.10.SB558,6,642. No grants may be awarded under this subsection to businesses that are 5adversely affected by a disaster-related state of emergency declared by the governor 6under s. 323.10 if all of the following apply:SB558,6,97a. The president of the United States has declared a major disaster to exist in 8this state, and the major disaster is the same disaster that forms the basis of the 9disaster-related state of emergency declared by the governor under s. 323.10.SB558,6,1210b. Federal aid is made available to the businesses that are adversely affected 11by the major disaster declared by the president of the United States in a manner 12similar to the grant program under this subsection.SB558,6,1913(5) Department of military affairs duties and powers. (a) Grant 14processing. Subject to subs. (3) (d) and (4) (d), the department of military affairs 15shall process an application for a grant under sub. (3) (a) 1. or (4) (a) 1. and award 16the grant to those eligible under sub. (3) (c) or (4) (c) for the individual’s or 17business’s eligible disaster-related expenses under sub. (3) (b) or (4) (b), as 18applicable, within 14 days of the individual’s or the business’s application for the 19grant.SB558,7,220(b) Additional funding. In any fiscal year in which the department of military 21affairs determines that it does not have sufficient funds to award as many grants as 22eligible individuals or businesses, the department of military affairs may request 23under s. 13.101 (3) that the joint committee on finance supplement a department of 1military affairs appropriation account with additional funds for the purpose of 2making grants.SB558,7,33